Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. FINANCES

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY FINANCES

CHAPTER 111. COUNTY BUDGET

SUBCHAPTER A. BUDGET PREPARATION IN COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF 225,000 OR LESS

Sec. 111.001. SUBCHAPTER APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF 225,000 OR LESS; EXCEPTION. This subchapter applies only to a county that has a population of 225,000 or less and that does not operate under Subchapter C.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 11(e), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 111.002. COUNTY JUDGE AS BUDGET OFFICER. The county judge serves as the budget officer for the commissioners court of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.003. ANNUAL BUDGET REQUIRED. (a) Not later than August 15, the county judge, assisted by the county auditor or county clerk, shall prepare a budget to cover all proposed expenditures of the county government for the succeeding fiscal year.

(b) A proposed budget that will require raising more revenue from property taxes than in the previous year must contain a cover page with the following statement in 18-point or larger type: "This budget will raise more total property taxes than last year's budget by (insert total dollar amount of increase and percentage increase), and of that amount (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll) is tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year."

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 117, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (S.B. 1357), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 111.004. ITEMIZED BUDGET; CONTENTS. (a) The county judge shall itemize the budget to allow as clear a comparison as practicable between expenditures included in the proposed budget and actual expenditures for the same or similar purposes that were made for the preceding fiscal year. The budget must show as definitely as possible each of the projects for which an appropriation is established in the budget and the estimated amount of money carried in the budget for each project.

(b) The budget must contain a complete financial statement of the county that shows:

(1) the outstanding obligations of the county;

(2) the cash on hand to the credit of each fund of the county government;

(3) the funds received from all sources during the preceding fiscal year;

(4) the funds available from all sources during the ensuing fiscal year;

(5) the estimated revenues available to cover the proposed budget; and

(6) the estimated tax rate required to cover the proposed budget.

(c) In preparing the budget, the county judge shall estimate the revenue to be derived from taxes to be levied and collected in the succeeding fiscal year and shall include that revenue in the estimate of funds available to cover the proposed budget.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.005. INFORMATION FURNISHED BY COUNTY OFFICERS. (a) In preparing the budget, the county judge may require any county officer to furnish existing information necessary for the judge to properly prepare the budget.

(b) If a county officer fails to provide the information as required by the county judge, the county judge may request the commissioners court to issue an order:

(1) directing the county officer to produce the required information; and

(2) prescribing the form in which the county officer must produce the information.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.006. PROPOSED BUDGET FILED WITH COUNTY CLERK; PUBLIC INSPECTION. (a) Not later than August 15, the county judge shall file a copy of the proposed budget with the county clerk.

(b) The copy of the proposed budget shall be available for inspection by any person. If the county maintains an Internet website, the county clerk shall take action to ensure that the proposed budget is posted on the website.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (S.B. 1357), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 111.007. PUBLIC HEARING ON PROPOSED BUDGET. (a) The commissioners court shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget. Any person may attend and may participate in the hearing.

(b) The commissioners court shall hold the hearing not later than the 25th day after the day the budget is filed under Section 111.006 but before the commissioners court adopts the county's ad valorem tax rate for the current tax year.

(c) The commissioners court shall give public notice that it will consider the proposed budget on the date of the hearing. The notice must state the date, time, and location of the hearing. The notice must include, in type of a size at least equal to the type used for other items in the notice, any statement required to be included in the proposed budget under Section 111.003(b). The commissioners court shall give notice under this subsection:

(1) not earlier than the 30th day before the date of the hearing; and

(2) not later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 117, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 612 (S.B. 1357), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2021.

Sec. 111.0075. SPECIAL NOTICE BY PUBLICATION FOR BUDGET HEARING. (a) A commissioners court shall publish notice before a public hearing relating to a budget in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(b) Notice published under this section is in addition to notice required by other law. Notice under this section shall be published not earlier than the 30th or later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) This section does not apply to a commissioners court required by other law to give notice by publication of a hearing on a budget.

(d) Notice under this section must include, in type of a size at least equal to the type used for other items in the notice, any statement required to be included in the proposed budget under Section 111.003(b).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 111.008. ADOPTION OF BUDGET. (a) At the conclusion of the public hearing, the commissioners court shall take action on the proposed budget. A vote to adopt the budget must be a record vote.

(b) The commissioners court may make any changes in the proposed budget that it considers warranted by the law and required by the interest of the taxpayers.

(c) Adoption of a budget that will require raising more revenue from property taxes than in the previous year requires a separate vote of the commissioners court to ratify the property tax increase reflected in the budget. A vote under this subsection is in addition to and separate from the vote to adopt the budget or a vote to set the tax rate required by Chapter 26, Tax Code, or other law.

(d) An adopted budget must contain a cover page that includes:

(1) one of the following statements in 18-point or larger type that accurately describes the adopted budget:

(A) "This budget will raise more revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of increase), which is a (insert percentage increase) percent increase from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(B) "This budget will raise less revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of decrease), which is a (insert percentage decrease) percent decrease from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll)."; or

(C) "This budget will raise the same amount of revenue from property taxes as last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(2) the record vote of each member of the commissioners court by name voting on the adoption of the budget;

(3) the county property tax rates for the preceding fiscal year, and each county property tax rate that has been adopted or calculated for the current fiscal year, including:

(A) the property tax rate;

(B) the no-new-revenue tax rate;

(C) the no-new-revenue maintenance and operations tax rate;

(D) the voter-approval tax rate; and

(E) the debt rate; and

(4) the total amount of county debt obligations.

(e) In this section, "debt obligation" means an issued public security as defined by Section 1201.002, Government Code, secured by property taxes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (S.B. 2), Sec. 80, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 111.009. APPROVED BUDGET FILED WITH COUNTY CLERK: POSTING ON INTERNET. (a) On final approval of the budget by the commissioners court, the court shall:

(1) file the budget with the county clerk; and

(2) if the county maintains an Internet website, take action to ensure that:

(A) a copy of the budget, including the cover page, is posted on the website; and

(B) the record vote described by Section 111.008(d)(2) is posted on the website at least until the first anniversary of the date the budget is adopted.

(b) The commissioners court shall take action to ensure that the cover page of the budget is amended to include the property tax rates required by Section 111.008(d)(3) for the current fiscal year if the rates are not included on the cover page when the budget is filed with the county clerk. The commissioners court shall file an amended cover page with the county clerk and take action to ensure that the amended cover page is posted on the county's website.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 111.010. LEVY OF TAXES AND EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS UNDER BUDGET; EMERGENCY EXPENDITURE; BUDGET TRANSFER. (a) The commissioners court may levy taxes only in accordance with the budget.

(b) After final approval of the budget, the commissioners court may spend county funds only in strict compliance with the budget, except in an emergency.

(c) The commissioners court may authorize an emergency expenditure as an amendment to the original budget only in a case of grave public necessity to meet an unusual and unforeseen condition that could not have been included in the original budget through the use of reasonably diligent thought and attention. If the court amends the original budget to meet an emergency, the court shall file a copy of its order amending the budget with the county clerk, and the clerk shall attach the copy to the original budget.

(d) The commissioners court by order may amend the budget to transfer an amount budgeted for one item to another budgeted item without authorizing an emergency expenditure.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 1, 2, eff. May 25, 1989.

Sec. 111.0105. BUDGET FOR EXPENDITURES FROM PROCEEDS OF BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS. If a county bond issue is submitted at an election or other authorized obligations are to be issued against future revenues and a tax is to be levied for those obligations, the commissioners court shall adopt a budget of proposed expenditures. On receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or other obligations, the county may make expenditures from the proceeds in the manner provided by this subchapter for expenditures for general purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0106. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR GRANT OR AID MONEY. The county auditor or the county judge in a county that does not have a county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all public or private grant or aid money that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the grant or aid money for its intended purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0107. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE FROM INTERGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTS. The county auditor or the county judge in a county that does not have a county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all revenue from intergovernmental contracts that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue from intergovernmental contracts for its intended purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0108. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE RECEIVED AFTER START OF FISCAL YEAR. The county auditor or the county judge in a county that does not have a county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of revenue from a new source not anticipated before the adoption of the budget and not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court may adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue for general purposes or for any of its intended purposes.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 938, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 111.011. CHANGES IN BUDGET FOR COUNTY PURPOSES. This subchapter does not prevent the commissioners court from making changes in the budget for county purposes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.012. PENALTY. (a) An officer, employee, or official of a county government who refuses to comply with this subchapter commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $1,000, confinement in the county jail for not less than one month or more than one year, or by both fine and confinement.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.013. LIMITATION ON BUDGET OF COUNTY AUDITOR. An increase from one fiscal year to the next in the amount budgeted for expenses of the county auditor's office or the salary of an assistant auditor shall not exceed five (5) percent without approval of the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 600, Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 111.014. RESERVE ITEM. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a county may establish in the budget a reserve or contingency item. The item must be included in the itemized budget under Section 111.004(a) in the same manner as a project for which an appropriation is established in the budget.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER B. BUDGET PREPARATION IN COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 225,000

Sec. 111.031. SUBCHAPTER APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 225,000; EXCEPTION. This subchapter applies only to a county that has a population of more than 225,000 and that does not operate under Subchapter C.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.032. COUNTY AUDITOR AS BUDGET OFFICER. The county auditor serves as budget officer for the commissioners court of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.033. ANNUAL BUDGET REQUIRED. (a) Within 30 days before the first day of each fiscal year or on or immediately after that first day, the county auditor shall prepare a budget to cover the proposed expenditures of the county government for that fiscal year.

(b) A proposed budget that will require raising more revenue from property taxes than in the previous year must contain a cover page with the following statement in 18-point or larger type: "This budget will raise more total property taxes than last year's budget by (insert total dollar amount of increase and percentage increase), and of that amount (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll) is tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year."

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 563 (S.B. 1510), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Reenacted by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 15.002, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 111.034. ITEMIZED BUDGET; CONTENTS. (a) The county auditor shall itemize the budget to allow as clear a comparison as practicable between expenditures included in the proposed budget and actual expenditures for the same or similar purposes that were made for the preceding fiscal year. The budget must show with reasonable accuracy each project for which an appropriation is established in the budget and the estimated amount of money carried in the budget for each project.

(b) The budget must contain a complete financial statement of the county that shows:

(1) the outstanding obligations of the county;

(2) the cash on hand to the credit of each fund of the county government;

(3) the funds received from all sources during the preceding fiscal year;

(4) the funds and revenue estimated by the auditor to be received from all sources during the preceding fiscal year;

(5) the funds and revenue estimated by the auditor to be received from all sources during the ensuing fiscal year; and

(6) a statement of all accounts and contracts on which sums are due to or owed by the county as of the last day of the preceding fiscal year, except for taxes and court costs.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.035. LIMITATION ON EXPENDITURES BEFORE ADOPTION OF BUDGET. Until a budget for a fiscal year is adopted by the commissioners court, the county may not make payments during that fiscal year except for emergencies and for obligations legally incurred before the first day of the fiscal year for salaries, utilities, materials, and supplies.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.036. INFORMATION FURNISHED BY OFFICERS. In preparing the budget, the county auditor may require any district, county, or precinct officer of the county to provide information necessary for the auditor to properly prepare the budget.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.037. PROPOSED BUDGET FILED WITH COUNTY CLERK; PUBLIC INSPECTION. (a) The county auditor shall file a copy of the proposed budget with the county clerk.

(b) The copy of the proposed budget shall be available for public inspection by any person. If the county maintains an Internet website, the county clerk shall take action to ensure that the proposed budget is posted on the website.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 111.038. PUBLIC HEARING ON PROPOSED BUDGET. (a) The commissioners court shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget. Any person may attend and may participate in the hearing.

(b) The commissioners court shall hold the hearing on a day within 10 calendar days after the date the proposed budget is filed but before the last day of the first month of the fiscal year.

(c) The commissioners court shall publish notice that it will consider the proposed budget on the date of the budget hearing. The notice must be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and must state the date, time, and location of the hearing.

(d) Notice under this section must include, in type of a size at least equal to the type used for other items in the notice, any statement required to be included in the proposed budget under Section 111.033(b).

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 552, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 111.0385. SPECIAL NOTICE BY PUBLICATION FOR BUDGET HEARING. (a) A commissioners court shall publish notice before a public hearing relating to a budget in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(b) Notice published under this section is in addition to notice required by other law. Notice under this section shall be published not earlier than the 30th or later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) This section does not apply to a commissioners court required by other law to give notice by publication of a hearing on a budget.

(d) Notice under this section must include, in type of a size at least equal to the type used for other items in the notice, any statement required to be included in the proposed budget under Section 111.033(b).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 111.039. ADOPTION OF BUDGET. (a) At the conclusion of the public hearing, the commissioners court shall take action on the proposed budget. A vote to adopt the budget must be a record vote.

(b) The commissioners court may make any changes in the proposed budget that it considers warranted by the facts and law and required by the interest of the taxpayers, but the amounts budgeted in a fiscal year for expenditures from the various funds of the county may not exceed the balances in those funds as of the first day of the fiscal year, plus the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year as estimated by the county auditor.

(c) Adoption of a budget that will require raising more revenue from property taxes than in the previous year requires a separate vote of the commissioners court to ratify the property tax increase reflected in the budget. A vote under this subsection is in addition to and separate from the vote to adopt the budget or a vote to set the tax rate required by Chapter 26, Tax Code, or other law.

(d) An adopted budget must contain a cover page that includes:

(1) one of the following statements in 18-point or larger type that accurately describes the adopted budget:

(A) "This budget will raise more revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of increase), which is a (insert percentage increase) percent increase from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(B) "This budget will raise less revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of decrease), which is a (insert percentage decrease) percent decrease from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll)."; or

(C) "This budget will raise the same amount of revenue from property taxes as last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(2) the record vote of each member of the commissioners court by name voting on the adoption of the budget;

(3) the county property tax rates for the preceding fiscal year, and each county property tax rate that has been adopted or calculated for the current fiscal year, including:

(A) the property tax rate;

(B) the no-new-revenue tax rate;

(C) the no-new-revenue maintenance and operations tax rate;

(D) the voter-approval tax rate; and

(E) the debt rate; and

(4) the total amount of county debt obligations.

(e) In this section, "debt obligation" means an issued public security as defined by Section 1201.002, Government Code, secured by property taxes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (S.B. 2), Sec. 81, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 111.040. APPROVED BUDGET FILED WITH OFFICERS: POSTING ON INTERNET. (a) On final approval of the budget by the commissioners court, the court shall:

(1) file a copy of the budget with the county auditor and the county clerk; and

(2) if the county maintains an Internet website, take action to ensure that:

(A) a copy of the budget, including the cover page, is posted on the website; and

(B) the record vote described by Section 111.039(d)(2) is posted on the website at least until the first anniversary of the date the budget is adopted.

(b) The commissioners court shall take action to ensure that the cover page of the budget is amended to include the property tax rates required by Section 111.039(d)(3) for the current fiscal year if the rates are not included on the cover page when the budget is filed with the county clerk. The commissioners court shall file an amended cover page with the county clerk and take action to ensure that the amended cover page is posted on the county's website.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 100, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 111.041. EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS UNDER BUDGET; EMERGENCY EXPENDITURE; BUDGET TRANSFER. (a) The commissioners court may spend county funds only in strict compliance with the budget, except as provided by this section.

(b) The commissioners court may authorize an emergency expenditure as an amendment to the original budget only in a case of grave public necessity to meet an unusual and unforeseen condition that could not have been included in the original budget through the use of reasonably diligent thought and attention. If the court amends the original budget to meet an emergency, the court shall file a copy of its order amending the budget with the county clerk, and the clerk shall attach the copy to the original budget.

(c) The commissioners court by order may amend the budget to transfer an amount budgeted for one item to another budgeted item without authorizing an emergency expenditure.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0415. CHANGES IN BUDGET FOR COUNTY PURPOSES. This subchapter does not prevent the commissioners court from making changes in the budget for county purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 4, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.042. BUDGET FOR EXPENDITURES FROM PROCEEDS OF BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS. If a county bond issue is submitted at an election or other authorized obligations are to be issued against future revenues and a tax is to be levied for those obligations, the commissioners court shall adopt a budget of proposed expenditures. On receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or other obligations, the county may make expenditures from the proceeds in the manner provided by this subchapter for expenditures for general purposes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 5, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.043. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR GRANT OR AID MONEY. The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all public or private grant or aid money that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the grant or aid money for its intended purpose.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.0431. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE FROM INTERGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTS. The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all revenue from intergovernmental contracts that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue from intergovernmental contracts for its intended purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 6, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0432. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE RECEIVED AFTER START OF FISCAL YEAR. The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of revenue from a new source not anticipated before the adoption of the budget and not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court may adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue for general purposes or for any of its intended purposes.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 938, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 111.044. LIMITATION ON BUDGET OF COUNTY AUDITOR. An increase from one fiscal year to the next in the amount budgeted for expenses of the county auditor's office or the salary of an assistant auditor shall not exceed five (5) percent without approval of the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 600, Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 111.045. RESERVE ITEM. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a county may establish in the budget a reserve or contingency item. The item must be included in the itemized budget under Section 111.034(a) in the same manner as a project for which an appropriation is established in the budget.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER C. ALTERNATE METHOD OF BUDGET PREPARATION IN COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 125,000

Sec. 111.061. SUBCHAPTER APPLICABLE TO COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 125,000. This subchapter applies only to a county that has a population of more than 125,000 and that chooses to operate under this subchapter instead of under Subchapter A or B.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1, Sec. 11(e), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 111.062. APPOINTMENT OF BUDGET OFFICER; ABOLITION OF OFFICE. (a) The commissioners court of the county may appoint a county budget officer to prepare a county budget for the fiscal year.

(b) A county that establishes the office of county budget officer may abolish that office only by a formal action of the commissioners court. The court must take the action after the first day of the second month of the fiscal year and before the first day of the sixth month of the fiscal year. If the office is abolished, the duties of budget officer shall be performed by:

(1) the county judge, if the county has a population of 225,000 or less; or

(2) the county auditor, if the county has a population of more than 225,000.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 593, Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 1993.

Sec. 111.063. ITEMIZED BUDGET; CONTENTS. (a) The budget officer shall itemize the budget to allow as clear a comparison as practicable between expenditures included in the proposed budget and actual or estimated expenditures for the same or similar purposes that were made for the preceding fiscal year. The budget must show with reasonable accuracy each of the projects for which an appropriation is established in the budget and the estimated amount of money carried in the budget for each project.

(b) The budget officer shall obtain from the county auditor any information necessary to prepare a complete financial statement for inclusion in the budget. The financial statement must show:

(1) the outstanding obligations of the county;

(2) the cash on hand to the credit of each fund of the county government;

(3) funds received from all sources during the preceding fiscal year;

(4) the funds and revenue estimated by the auditor to be received from all sources during the preceding fiscal year;

(5) the funds and revenue estimated by the auditor to be received during the ensuing year; and

(6) a statement of all accounts and contracts on which sums are due to or owed by the county as of the last day of the preceding fiscal year, except for taxes and court costs.

(c) If actual amounts for the information described by Subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), or (b)(6) are not available at the time the budget officer prepares the financial statement, the budget officer may use in the preparation of the statement estimates of that information made by the county auditor.

(d) Subsection (c) does not prevent the commissioners court from adopting a budget before the beginning of the fiscal year for which the budget is prepared.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1044, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 111.064. LIMITATION ON EXPENDITURES BEFORE ADOPTION OF BUDGET. Until a budget for a fiscal year is adopted by the commissioners court, the county may not make payments during that fiscal year except for emergencies and for obligations legally incurred before the first day of the fiscal year for salaries, utilities, materials, and supplies.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.065. INFORMATION FURNISHED BY OFFICERS. In preparing or monitoring the budget, the budget officer may require the county auditor or any other district, county, or precinct officer of the county to provide any information necessary for the budget officer to properly prepare or monitor the budget.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.066. PROPOSED BUDGET FILED WITH COUNTY CLERK AND COUNTY AUDITOR; PUBLIC INSPECTION. (a) The budget officer shall file a copy of the proposed budget with the county clerk and the county auditor.

(b) The copy of the proposed budget shall be available for public inspection.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.067. PUBLIC HEARING ON PROPOSED BUDGET. (a) The commissioners court shall hold a public hearing on the proposed budget. Any taxpayer of the county may attend and may participate in the hearing.

(b) The commissioners court shall hold the hearing on a day within 10 calendar days after the date the proposed budget is filed but before the last day of the first month of the fiscal year.

(c) The commissioners court shall publish notice that it will consider the proposed budget on the date of the budget hearing. The notice must be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county and must state the date, time, and location of the hearing.

(d) Notice under this section must include, in type of a size at least equal to the type used for other items in the notice, any statement required to be included in the proposed budget under Section 111.033(b).

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 552, Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 924 (H.B. 3195), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 111.0675. COMMISSIONERS COURT: SPECIAL NOTICE BY PUBLICATION FOR BUDGET HEARING. (a) A commissioners court shall publish notice before a public hearing relating to a budget in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county.

(b) Notice published under this section is in addition to notice required by other law. Notice under this section shall be published not earlier than the 30th or later than the 10th day before the date of the hearing.

(c) This section does not apply to a commissioners court required by other law to give notice by publication of a hearing on a budget.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 111.068. ADOPTION OF BUDGET. (a) At the conclusion of the public hearing, the commissioners court shall take action on the proposed budget. A vote to adopt the budget must be a record vote.

(b) The commissioners court may make any changes in the proposed budget that it considers warranted by the facts and law and required by the interest of the taxpayers, but the amounts budgeted in a fiscal year for expenditures from the various funds of the county may not exceed the balances in those funds as of the first day of the fiscal year, plus the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year as estimated by the county auditor.

(c) An adopted budget must contain a cover page that includes:

(1) one of the following statements in 18-point or larger type that accurately describes the adopted budget:

(A) "This budget will raise more revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of increase), which is a (insert percentage increase) percent increase from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(B) "This budget will raise less revenue from property taxes than last year's budget by an amount of (insert total dollar amount of decrease), which is a (insert percentage decrease) percent decrease from last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll)."; or

(C) "This budget will raise the same amount of revenue from property taxes as last year's budget. The property tax revenue to be raised from new property added to the tax roll this year is (insert amount computed by multiplying the proposed tax rate by the value of new property added to the roll).";

(2) the record vote of each member of the commissioners court by name voting on the adoption of the budget;

(3) the county property tax rates for the preceding fiscal year, and each county property tax rate that has been adopted or calculated for the current fiscal year, including:

(A) the property tax rate;

(B) the no-new-revenue tax rate;

(C) the no-new-revenue maintenance and operations tax rate;

(D) the voter-approval tax rate; and

(E) the debt rate; and

(4) the total amount of county debt obligations.

(d) In this section, "debt obligation" means an issued public security as defined by Section 1201.002, Government Code, secured by property taxes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (S.B. 2), Sec. 82, eff. January 1, 2020.

Sec. 111.069. APPROVED BUDGET FILED WITH OFFICERS; POSTING ON INTERNET. (a) On final approval of the budget by the commissioners court, the court shall:

(1) file a copy of the budget with the county auditor and the county clerk; and

(2) if the county maintains an Internet website, take action to ensure that:

(A) a copy of the budget, including the cover page, is posted on the website; and

(B) the record vote described by Section 111.068(c)(2) is posted on the website at least until the first anniversary of the date the budget is adopted.

(b) The commissioners court shall take action to ensure that the cover page of the budget is amended to include the property tax rates required by Section 111.068(c)(3) for the current fiscal year if the rates are not included on the cover page when the budget is filed with the county clerk. The commissioners court shall file an amended cover page with the county clerk and take action to ensure that the amended cover page is posted on the county's website.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 101, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 457 (S.B. 1692), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1329 (S.B. 656), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 111.070. EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS UNDER BUDGET; EMERGENCY EXPENDITURE; BUDGET TRANSFER. (a) The commissioners court may spend county funds only in strict compliance with the budget, except as provided by this section.

(b) The commissioners court may authorize an emergency expenditure as an amendment to the original budget only in a case of grave public necessity to meet an unusual and unforeseen condition that could not have been included in the original budget through the use of reasonably diligent thought and attention. If the court amends the original budget to meet an emergency, the court shall file a copy of its order amending the budget with the county clerk and the clerk shall attach the copy to the original budget.

(c) The commissioners court by order may:

(1) amend the budget to transfer an amount budgeted for one item to another budgeted item without authorizing an emergency expenditure; or

(2) designate the county budget officer or another officer or employee of the county who may, as appropriate and subject to conditions and directions provided by the court, amend the budget by transferring amounts budgeted for certain items to other budgeted items.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 7, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1121 (H.B. 2458), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 111.0705. BUDGET FOR EXPENDITURES FROM PROCEEDS OF BONDS OR OTHER OBLIGATIONS. If a county bond issue is submitted at an election or other authorized obligations are to be issued against future revenues and a tax is to be levied for those obligations, the commissioners court shall adopt a budget of proposed expenditures. On receipt of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or other obligations, the county may make expenditures from the proceeds in the manner provided by this subchapter for expenditures for general purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 8, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0706. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR GRANT OR AID MONEY. The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all public or private grant or aid money that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the grant or aid money for its intended purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 8, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0707. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE FROM INTERGOVERNMENTAL CONTRACTS. (a) The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of all revenue from intergovernmental contracts that is available for disbursement in a fiscal year but not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court shall adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue from intergovernmental contracts for its intended purpose.

(b) The county treasurer shall notify the county auditor of the receipt of all revenue from intergovernmental contracts not previously included in a special budget or the annual budget for that fiscal year.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 8, eff. June 20, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 111.07075. SPECIAL BUDGET FOR REVENUE RECEIVED AFTER START OF FISCAL YEAR. (a) The county auditor shall certify to the commissioners court the receipt of revenue from a new source not anticipated before the adoption of the budget and not included in the budget for that fiscal year. On certification, the court may adopt a special budget for the limited purpose of spending the revenue for general purposes or for any of its intended purposes.

(b) The county treasurer shall notify the county auditor of the receipt of all revenue from a new source not anticipated before the adoption of the budget and not previously included in a special budget or the annual budget for that fiscal year.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 938, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 373), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 111.0708. PLEDGING REVENUE AS SECURITY FOR BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. In preparing a county budget, a county may secure county bonds or other obligations by pledging for the term of the bonds or other obligations:

(1) any security authorized by law; or

(2) any revenue or receipts obtained by the county from the levy of a state tax if the state is required to pay the county the proceeds or receipts from the tax.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 8, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.0709. CHANGES IN BUDGET FOR COUNTY PURPOSES. This subchapter does not prevent the commissioners court from making changes in the budget for county purposes.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 8, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.071. BUDGET OFFICER'S ASSISTANCE TO COMMISSIONERS COURT. The budget officer may assist the commissioners court in the performance of the court's duties relating to the efficiency and effectiveness of county operations.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.072. DUTIES RETAINED BY COUNTY AUDITOR. The duties given under Subchapter B to the county auditor that are not expressly conferred by this subchapter on the budget officer remain duties of the county auditor.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.073. EMPLOYMENT OF PERSONNEL. The commissioners court may employ personnel necessary to assist the budget officer in the performance of the duties of that office.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.074. LIMITATION ON BUDGET OF COUNTY AUDITOR. An increase from one fiscal year to the next in the amount budgeted for expenses of the county auditor's office or the salary of an assistant auditor shall not exceed five (5) percent without approval of the commissioners court.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 600, Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 739, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.

Sec. 111.075. RESERVE ITEM. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a county may establish in the budget a reserve or contingency item. The item must be included in the itemized budget under Section 111.063(a) in the same manner as a project for which an appropriation is established in the budget.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER D. BUDGET APPROPRIATIONS

Sec. 111.091. APPROPRIATION ACCOUNTS. (a) On the adoption and certification of a general or special county budget, the county auditor shall open an appropriation account for each main budgeted or special item in the budget.

(b) The county auditor shall enter to an appropriation account each warrant drawn against that appropriation.

(c) The county auditor periodically shall inform the commissioners court of the condition of the appropriation accounts.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.092. DEPARTMENTAL EXPENSES NOT TO EXCEED APPROPRIATIONS. The county auditor shall oversee the warrant process to ensure that the expenses of any department do not exceed the budget appropriations for that department.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.093. APPROPRIATIONS FOR PURCHASES, CONTRACTS, SALARIES, OR LABOR EXPENSES IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN 225,000. (a) This section applies only to a county with a population of more than 225,000.

(b) The county auditor shall charge all purchase orders, requisitions, contracts, and salary and labor allowances to the appropriation accounts.

(c) A requisition issued or a contract for work, labor, services, or materials and supplies that is entered into in the manner provided by law by a proper authority is not binding until the county auditor certifies that the budget contains an ample provision for the obligation and that funds are or will be available to pay the obligation when due.

(d) The amount allocated in the budget for a purchase order, requisition, contract, special purpose, or salary or labor account may not be allocated for any other purpose unless an unexpended balance remains in the account after full discharge of the obligation or unless the requisition, contract, or allocation is canceled in writing by the commissioners court or a county officer for a valid reason.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 111.094. ITEMIZED BUDGET. The commissioners court in preparing the county budget shall determine the amount of county funds to be spent for the juvenile probation department in the county budget.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 9, eff. June 20, 1997.

Sec. 111.095. SPECIAL FUNDS. (a) This section shall apply to all funds maintained and controlled by a county tax assessor-collector that are not included in the county budget.

(b) At least 60 days before the first day of the county's fiscal year, the county tax assessor-collector shall prepare a budget for the expenditure of the funds during that fiscal year and file a copy of that budget with the county budget officer. The county budget officer shall make a copy of the budget filed with the budget officer available to the public at all reasonable times. The budget filed with the county budget officer is not subject to approval by the commissioners court of the county, but any member of the public is entitled to speak for or against the budget during the county's budget process. Funds in the accounts under this section may be spent only in compliance with the budget filed with the county budget officer under this subsection.

(c) Funds in the accounts under this section may not be used to supplement the salary or cover the personal expenses of the county tax assessor-collector.

(d) The provisions of this section are cumulative with the provisions of other statutes pertaining to county funds.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 938, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 111.096. BUDGETED POSITIONS FOR JUDICIARY. Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioners court in preparing the county budget for a fiscal year shall determine the number of any additional positions authorized under Section 75.401, Government Code, to be included in the budget and the maximum compensation for those positions.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1110 (H.B. 4104), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.